California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) (1) Except in the case of infraction violations, with the consent of the minor, a hearing before a juvenile hearing officer, or a hearing before a referee or a judge of the juvenile court, when the minor, who is between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, is charged with an offense as specified in this section, may be conducted upon an exact legible copy of a written notice given pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 40500) of Chapter 2 of Division 17 or Section 41103 of the Vehicle Code, or an exact legible copy of a written notice given pursuant to Chapter 5C (commencing with Section
 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code when the offense charged is a violation listed in Section 256, or an exact legible copy of a citation as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 660.5, or an exact legible copy of the notice given pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 601 when the minor is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 601, in lieu of a petition as provided in Article 16 (commencing with Section 650).

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of infraction violations, consent of the minor is not required prior to conducting a hearing upon written notice to appear.

(b) Prior to the hearing, the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer may request the probation officer to commence a proceeding, as provided in Article 16 (commencing with Section 650), in lieu of a hearing in Informal Juvenile and Traffic
 Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 193, Sec. 3.   (SB 1484)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

258.

(a) Upon a hearing conducted in accordance with Section 257, and upon either an admission by the minor of the commission of a violation charged, or a finding that the minor did in fact commit the violation, the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer may do any of the following:

(1) Reprimand the minor and take no further action.

(2) Direct that the probation officer undertake a program of supervision of the minor for a period not to exceed six months, in addition to or in place of the following orders.

(3) Order that the minor pay a fine up to the amount that an adult would pay for the same
 violation, unless the violation is otherwise specified within this section, in which case the fine shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250). This fine may be levied in addition to or in place of the following orders and the court may waive any or all of this fine, if the minor is unable to pay. In determining the minor’s ability to pay, the court shall not consider the ability of the minor’s family to pay.

(4) Subject to the minor’s right to a restitution hearing, order that the minor pay restitution to the victim, in lieu of all or a portion of the fine specified in paragraph (3). The total dollar amount of the fine, restitution, and any program fees ordered pursuant to paragraph (9) shall not exceed the maximum amount which may be ordered pursuant to paragraph (3). This paragraph shall not be construed to limit the right to recover damages, less any amount actually paid in restitution, in a civil action.

(5) Order that the driving privileges of the minor be suspended or restricted as provided in the Vehicle Code or, notwithstanding Section 13203 of the Vehicle Code or any other provision of law, when the Vehicle Code does not provide for the suspension or restriction of driving privileges, that, in addition to any other order, the driving privileges of the minor be suspended or restricted for a period of not to exceed 30 days.

(6) In the case of a traffic related offense, order the minor to attend a licensed traffic school, or other court approved program of traffic school instruction pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 11200) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, to be completed by the juvenile within 60 days of the court order.

(7) Order that the minor produce satisfactory evidence that the vehicle or its
 equipment has been made to conform with the requirements of the Vehicle Code pursuant to Section 40150 of the Vehicle Code if the violation involved an equipment violation.

(8) Order that the minor perform community service work in a public entity or any private nonprofit entity, for not more than 50 hours over a period of 60 days, during times other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment. Work performed pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed 30 hours during any 30-day period. The timeframes established by this paragraph shall not be modified except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served. When the order to work is made by a referee or a juvenile hearing officer, it shall be approved by a judge of the juvenile court.

For purposes of this paragraph, a judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer shall not, without the consent of the minor, order the
 minor to perform work with a private nonprofit entity that is affiliated with any religion.

(9) In the case of a misdemeanor, order that the minor participate in and complete a counseling or educational program, or, if the offense involved a violation of a controlled substance law, a drug treatment program, if those programs are available. Fees for participation shall be subject to the right to a hearing as the minor’s ability to pay and shall not, together with any fine or restitution order, exceed the maximum amount that may be ordered pursuant to paragraph (3).

(10) Require that the minor attend a school program without unexcused absence.

(11) If the offense is a misdemeanor committed between 10 p.m. and 6 a.m., require that the minor be at his or her legal residence at hours to be specified by the juvenile
 hearing officer between the hours of 10 p.m. and 6 a.m., except for a medical or other emergency, unless the minor is accompanied by his or her parent, guardian, or other person in charge of the minor. The maximum length of an order made pursuant to this paragraph shall be six months from the effective date of the order.

(12) Make any or all of the following orders with respect to a violation of the Fish and Game Code which is not charged as a felony:

(A) That the fishing or hunting license involved be suspended or restricted.

(B) That the minor work in a park or conservation area for a total of not to exceed 20 hours over a period not to exceed 30 days, during times other than his or her hours of school attendance or employment.

(C) That the minor
 forfeit, pursuant to Section 12157 of the Fish and Game Code, any device or apparatus designed to be, and capable of being, used to take birds, mammals, fish, reptiles, or amphibia and that was used in committing the violation charged. The judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer shall, if the minor committed an offense that is punishable under Section 12008 or 12008.1 of the Fish and Game Code, order the device or apparatus forfeited pursuant to Section 12157 of the Fish and Game Code.

(13) If the violation charged is of an ordinance of a city, county, or local agency relating to loitering, curfew, or fare evasion on a public transportation system, as defined by Section 99211 of the Public Utilities Code, or is a violation of Section 640 or 640a of the Penal Code, make the order that the minor shall perform community service for a total time not to exceed 20 hours over a period not to exceed 30 days, during times other than his or her hours
 of school attendance or employment.

(b) If the minor is before the court on the basis of truancy, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 601, all of the following procedures and limitations shall apply:

(1) The judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer shall not proceed with a hearing unless both of the following have been provided to the court:

(A) Evidence that the minor’s school has undertaken the actions specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 48264.5 of the Education Code. If the school district does not have an attendance review board, as described in Section 48321 of the Education Code, the minor’s school is not required to provide evidence to the court of any actions the school has undertaken that demonstrate the intervention of a school attendance review board.

(B) The available record of previous attempts to address the minor’s truancy.

(2) The court is encouraged to set the hearing outside of school hours, so as to avoid causing the minor to miss additional school time.

(3) Pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 257, the minor and his or her parents shall be advised of the minor’s right to refuse consent to a hearing conducted upon a written notice to appear.

(4) The minor’s parents shall be permitted to participate in the hearing.

(5) The judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer may continue the hearing to allow the minor the opportunity to demonstrate improved attendance before imposing any of the orders specified in
 paragraph (6). Upon demonstration of improved attendance, the court may dismiss the case.

(6) Upon a finding that the minor violated subdivision (b) of Section 601, the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer shall direct his or her orders at improving the minor’s school attendance. The judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer may do any of the following:

(A) Order the minor to perform community service work, as described in Section 48264.5 of the Education Code, which may be performed at the minor’s school.

(B) Order the payment of a fine by the minor of not more than fifty dollars ($50), for which a parent or legal guardian of the minor may be jointly liable. The fine described in this subparagraph shall not be subject to Section 1464 of the Penal Code or additional penalty pursuant to any other law. The
 minor, at his or her discretion, may perform community service, as described in subparagraph (A), in lieu of any fine imposed under this subparagraph.

(C) Order a combination of community service work described in subparagraph (A) and payment of a portion of the fine described in subparagraph (B).

(D) Restrict driving privileges in the manner set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a). The minor may request removal of the driving restrictions if he or she provides proof of school attendance, high school graduation, GED completion, or enrollment in adult education, a community college, or a trade program. Any driving restriction shall be removed at the time the minor attains 18 years of age.

(c) (1) The judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer shall retain jurisdiction of the case until all
 orders made under this section have been fully complied with.

(2) If a minor is before the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer on the basis of truancy, jurisdiction shall be terminated upon the minor attaining 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 49.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

A juvenile hearing officer shall promptly furnish a written report of his or her findings and orders to the clerk of the juvenile court. The clerk of the juvenile court shall promptly transmit an abstract of those findings and orders to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 679, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

261.

Subject to the provisions of Section 262, all orders of a juvenile hearing officer shall be immediately effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 679, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

262.

Upon motion of the minor or his or her parent or guardian for good cause, or upon his or her own motion, a judge of the juvenile court may set aside or modify any order of a juvenile hearing officer, or may order or himself or herself conduct a rehearing. If the minor or parent or guardian has made a motion that the judge set aside or modify the order or has applied for a rehearing, and the judge has not set aside or modified the order or ordered or conducted a rehearing within 10 days after the date of the order, the motion or application shall be deemed denied as of the expiration of that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 679, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

263.

At any time prior to the final disposition of a hearing pursuant to Section 257, the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer may, on motion of the minor, his or her parent, or guardian, or on its own motion, transfer the case to the county of the minor’s residence for further proceedings pursuant to Sections 258, 260, 261, and 262.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 679, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

264.

At the direction and under the supervision of the Judicial Council, judges of the juvenile courts and juvenile court referees shall meet from time to time in statewide or regional conferences, to discuss problems arising in the course of administration of this chapter, for the purpose of improving the administration of justice in the juvenile courts. Actual and necessary expenses incurred by a judge or referee in attending any such conference shall be a charge upon the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

265.

The Judicial Council shall establish rules governing practice and procedure in the juvenile court not inconsistent with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Probation Officers [270. - 286.]

270.

The chief probation officer shall be appointed and compensation for the position shall be determined as provided in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 27770) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 57.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

271.

In counties having charters that provide a method of appointment and tenure of office for the superintendent, matron, and other employees of the juvenile hall, the charter provisions shall control as to those matters and, in counties that have established or hereafter establish merit or civil service systems governing the methods of appointment and the tenure of office for the superintendent, matrons, and other employees of the juvenile hall, the provisions of the merit or civil service systems shall control as to those matters. In all other counties, these matters shall be controlled exclusively by the provisions of this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 59.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

272.

(a) (1) The board of supervisors may delegate to the county welfare department all or part of the duties of the probation officer concerning dependent children described in Section 300. 

(2) The State Department of Social Services may delegate child welfare service or AFDC-FC foster care payment duties, or both, concerning dependent children described in Section 300 to any Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(b) The board of supervisors may also delegate to those persons within the county welfare department and to any Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 performing child welfare services the probation officer’s right of access to state summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 11105 of the Penal Code as is necessary to carry out its duties concerning children reasonably believed to be described by Section 300. The information shall include any current incarceration, the location of any current probation or parole, any current requirement that the individual register pursuant to Section 290 or 457.1 of the Penal Code, or pursuant to Section 11140 or 11590 of the Health and Safety Code, and any history of offenses involving abuse or neglect of, or violence against, a child, or convictions of any offenses involving violence, sexual offenses, the abuse or illegal possession, manufacture, or sale of alcohol or controlled substances, and any arrest for which the person is released on bail or on his or her own recognizance.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a social worker in a county welfare department or an Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 may perform the duties specified by Section 306.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 724, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

273.

The probation officer may, within budgetary limitations established by the board of supervisors, employ such psychiatrists, psychologists, and other clinical experts as are required to assist in determining appropriate treatment of minors within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and in the implementation of such treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

274.

Each probation officer and each assistant and deputy probation officer receiving an official salary shall furnish a bond in the sum of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and approved by the judge of the juvenile court, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duties of his office. If such bonds, or any of them, are furnished by a surety company licensed to transact business in the state, the premium thereon shall be paid out of the county treasury. In the event the probation officer, assistants and deputies are included as covered employees in a master bond pursuant to Sections 1481 and 1481.1 of the Government Code, the individual bonds prescribed above shall not be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

275.

(a) For the purpose of handling the reimbursement and other payments provided for in this chapter, the probation officer or other county officer designated by the board of supervisors of the county shall keep suitable books and accounts and shall give and keep suitable receipts and vouchers. 

(b) The auditor of the county shall audit these books and accounts annually, or at least biennially if so ordered by the board of supervisors upon the recommendation of the county auditor, on a fiscal year basis ending June 30 and shall make a report thereon to the judge of the court and to the supervisors of the county prior to the 31st day of the next succeeding month of January. This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 1993, and shall remain inoperative until July 1, 1994, on which date this section shall become operative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 60, Sec. 12.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

276.

In addition to the powers and duties of the probation officer elsewhere prescribed in this chapter, the probation officer is authorized to receive money, give his or her receipt therefor, deposit or invest such money as soon as practicable in the county treasury, in a commercial bank account designated and approved for such a purpose by the board of supervisors, or in investment certificates or share accounts issued by a savings and loan association doing business in this state, insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation and designated and approved for such purpose by the board of supervisors, and direct the disbursement thereof, in any of the following instances:

(a) Money payable to spouse or child in an action for divorce, separate maintenance, or similar action, together with court costs, upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Instead of designating the probation officer to act as court trustee for the receipt and disbursement of money payable to a spouse or child under this subdivision, the court may designate in its order a bonded employee of the court to act as court trustee for that purpose.

(b) Money payable to or on behalf of a ward or dependent child of the juvenile court or a person concerning whom a petition has been filed in the juvenile court. The probation officer may petition the court for approval of any past or prospective disbursement.

(c) Money payable to, by, or on behalf of probationers under the supervision of the probation officer. The probation officer may petition the court for approval of any past or prospective disbursement.

(d) Money payable to a child, wife, or indigent parent when it has been alleged or claimed that there has been a violation of either Section 270, 270a, or 270c of the Penal Code and the matter has been referred to the probation officer by the district attorney.

(e) Gifts of money made to the county to assist in the prevention or correction of delinquency or crime when the donor requests the probation officer to disburse such funds for such purposes and the board of supervisors accepts the gift upon such conditions.

(f) Other similar cases.

In addition to the foregoing, the probation officer is authorized to receive money payable to the county when ordered to do so by a court of competent jurisdiction. Such money shall be deposited or invested in the same manner as the other items set forth in this section.

If a bank account or savings and loan association investment certificate or share account is authorized pursuant to this section, the probation officer shall pay into the county treasury all money collected by him or under his or her control during the preceding month that is payable into the treasury in conformity with Section 24353 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 848, Sec. 13.   Effective September 22, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

277.

The probation officer may authorize the sale of articles of handiwork made by wards under the jurisdiction of the probation officer to the public at probation institutions, in public buildings, at fairs, or on property operated by nonprofit associations. The cost of any county materials or other property consumed in the manufacture of articles shall be paid for out of funds received from the sale of the articles. The remainder of any funds received from the sale of the articles shall be placed in the ward’s trust account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 276.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

278.

The board of supervisors may delegate to the auditor or other county officer any of the functions of the probation officer authorized by Section 276 and required by Sections 1685 to 1687, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

279.

The board of supervisors may impose a service charge at a uniform rate sufficient to defray the cost of services of the probation officer or other officer designated to act as trustee, not exceeding 2 percent of the amount collected, in addition to the payments made under subdivision (a), (c), (d), or (f) of Section 276. However, a service charge may not be imposed for services relating to child support.

The service charge imposed in relation to payments under subdivision (c) of Section 276 shall be imposed only for payments made by probationers, and the service charge imposed in relation to payments made under subdivision (f) of Section 276 shall be imposed only for cases similar to those listed in subdivision (a), (c), or (d) of that section.

When the payments are ordered by the court, the payment of the service charge shall be included in the order. All proceeds shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 848, Sec. 14.   Effective September 22, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

280.

Except where waived by the probation officer, judge, or referee and the minor, the probation officer shall be present in court to represent the interests of each person who is the subject of a petition to declare that person to be a ward or dependent child upon all hearings or rehearings of his or her case, and shall furnish to the court such information and assistance as the court may require. If so ordered, the probation officer shall take charge of that person before and after any hearing or rehearing.

It shall be the duty of the probation officer to prepare for every hearing on the disposition of a case as provided by Section 356, 358, 358.1, 361.5, 364, 366, 366.2, or 366.21 as is appropriate for the specific hearing, or, for a hearing as provided by Section 702, a social study of the minor, containing such matters as may be relevant to a proper disposition of the case. The social study shall include a recommendation for the disposition of the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1485, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

281.

The probation officer shall upon order of any court in any matter involving the custody, status, or welfare of a minor or minors, make an investigation of appropriate facts and circumstances and prepare and file with the court written reports and written recommendations in reference to such matters. The court is authorized to receive and consider the reports and recommendations of the probation officer in determining any such matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

281.5.

If a probation officer determines to recommend to the court that a minor alleged to come within Section 300, 601, or 602, or adjudged to come within Section 300, 601, or 602 should be removed from the physical custody of his parent or guardian, the probation officer shall give primary consideration to recommending to the court that the minor be placed with a relative of the minor, if such placement is in the best interests of the minor and will be conducive to reunification of the family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

282.

At any time the judge of the juvenile court may, and upon the request of the county board of supervisors shall, require the probation officer to examine into and report to the court upon the qualifications and management of any society, association, or corporation, other than a state institution, which applies for or receives custody of any ward or dependent child of the juvenile court. No probation officer, however, shall, under authority of this section, enter any institution without its consent. If such consent is refused, commitments to that institution shall not be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

283.

Every probation officer, assistant probation officer, and deputy probation officer shall have the powers and authority conferred by law upon peace officers listed in Section 830.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

284.

All probation officers shall make such special and periodic reports to the Youth Authority as the authority may require and upon forms furnished by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

285.

All probation officers shall make periodic reports to the Attorney General at those times and in the manner prescribed by the Attorney General, provided that no names or social security numbers shall be transmitted regarding any proceeding under Section 300 or 601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 405, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

286.

Any person lawfully appointed to serve as a probation officer or assistant or deputy probation officer prior to the effective date of this section shall continue in his office or employment as if appointed in the manner prescribed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Notices in Dependent Child Proceedings [290.1. - 297.]

290.1.

If the probation officer or social worker determines that the child shall be retained in custody, he or she shall immediately file a petition pursuant to Section 332 with the clerk of the juvenile court, who shall set the matter for hearing on the detention hearing calendar. The probation officer or social worker shall serve notice as prescribed in this section.

(a) Notice shall be given to the following persons whose whereabouts are known or become known prior to the initial petition hearing:

(1) The mother.

(2) The father or fathers, presumed and alleged.

(3) The legal guardian or
 guardians.

(4) The Indian custodian, if it is known that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(5) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older.

(6) The child’s tribe, if it is known that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(7) Any known sibling of the child who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney. However, notice is not required to be given to any sibling whose matter is
 calendared in the same court on the same day.

(8) If there is no parent or guardian residing in California, or if the residence is unknown, then to any adult relative residing within the county, or, if none, the adult relative residing nearest the court.

(9) The attorney for the parent or parents, legal guardian or guardians, or Indian custodian.

(10) The district attorney, if the district attorney has notified the clerk of the court that he or she wishes to receive the petition, containing the time, date, and place of the hearing.

(11) The probate department of the superior court that appointed the guardian, if the child is a ward of a guardian appointed pursuant to the Probate Code.

(b) No notice is required for a parent whose parental rights have been terminated.

(c) The notice shall be given as soon as possible after the filing of the petition.

(d) The notice of the initial petition hearing shall include all of the following:

(1) The date, time, and place of the hearing.

(2) The name of the child.

(3) A copy of the petition.

(e) Service of the notice shall be written or oral. If the person being served cannot read, notice shall be given orally.

(f) Notice shall not be served electronically under this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 9.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

290.2.

Upon the filing of a petition by a probation officer or social worker, the clerk of the juvenile court shall issue notice, to which shall be attached a copy of the petition, and he or she shall cause the same to be served as prescribed in this section.

(a) Notice shall be given to the following persons whose address is known or becomes known prior to the initial petition hearing:

(1) The mother.

(2) The father or fathers, presumed and alleged.

(3) The legal guardian or guardians.

(4) The Indian custodian, if it is known that the
 child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(5) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older.

(6) The child’s tribe, if it is known that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(7) Any known sibling of the child who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney. However, notice is not required to be given to any sibling whose matter is calendared in the same court on the same day.

(8) If there is no
 parent or guardian residing in California, or, if the residence is unknown, to any adult relative residing within the county, or, if none, the adult relative residing nearest the court.

(9) Upon reasonable notification by counsel representing the child, parent, or guardian, the clerk of the court shall give notice to that counsel as soon as possible.

(10) The district attorney, if the district attorney has notified the clerk of the court that he or she wishes to receive the petition, containing the time, date, and place of the hearing.

(11) The probate department of the superior court that appointed the guardian, if the child is a ward of a guardian appointed pursuant to the Probate Code.

(b) Notice is not required for a parent whose parental rights
 have been terminated.

(c) Notice shall be served as follows:

(1) If the child is retained in custody, the notice shall be given to the persons required to be noticed as soon as possible, and at least five days before the hearing, unless the hearing is set to be heard in less than five days in which case notice shall be given at least 24 hours prior to the hearing.

(2) If the child is not retained in custody, the notice shall be given to those persons required to be noticed at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing. If any person who is required to be given notice is known to reside outside of the county, the clerk of the juvenile court shall mail the notice and copy of the petition by first-class mail to that person as soon as possible after the filing of the petition and at least 10 days before the time set
 for hearing. Failure to respond to the notice is not cause for an arrest or detention. In the instance of a failure to appear after notice by first-class mail, the court shall direct that the notice and copy of the petition be personally served on all persons required to receive the notice and copy of the petition. For these purposes, personal service of the notice and copy of the petition outside of the county at least 10 days before the time set for hearing is equivalent to service by first-class mail. Service may be waived by any person by a voluntary appearance entered in the minutes of the court or by a written waiver of service filed with the clerk of the court at, or prior to, the hearing.

(3) Notice shall not be served electronically under this section.

(d) The notice of the initial petition hearing shall include all of the following:

(1) The date, time, and place of the hearing.

(2) The name of the child.

(3) A copy of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 10.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

291.

After the initial petition hearing, the clerk of the court shall cause the notice to be served in the following manner:

(a) Notice of the hearing shall be given to the following persons:

(1) The mother.

(2) The father or fathers, presumed and alleged.

(3) The legal guardian or guardians.

(4) The Indian custodian, if it is known that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(5) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older.

(6) The child’s tribe, if known, and any tribe in which the child may be a member or eligible for membership if the specific tribe is not known, and it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1.

(7) Any known sibling of the child who is the subject of the hearing if that sibling either is the subject of a dependency proceeding or has been adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court. If the sibling is 10 years of age or older, the sibling, the sibling’s caregiver, and the sibling’s attorney. If the sibling is under 10 years of age, the sibling’s caregiver and the sibling’s attorney. However, notice is not required to be given to any sibling whose matter is calendared in the same court on the same day.

(8) Each attorney of record unless counsel of record
 is present in court when the hearing is scheduled, then no further notice need be given.

(9) If there is no parent or guardian residing in California, or if the residence is unknown, then to any adult relative residing within the county, or, if none, the adult relative residing nearest the court.

(10) If the hearing is a dispositional hearing that is also serving as a permanency hearing pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 361.5, notice shall be given to the current caregiver for the child, including foster parents, relative caregivers, preadoptive parents, nonrelative extended family members, and resource family. Any person notified may attend all hearings and may submit any information he or she deems relevant to the court in writing.

(b) No notice is required for a parent whose parental rights have been
 terminated.

(c) Notice shall be served as follows:

(1) If the child is detained, the notice shall be given to the persons required to be noticed as soon as possible, and at least five days before the hearing, unless the hearing is set less than five days and then at least 24 hours before the hearing.

(2) If the child is not detained, the notice shall be given to those persons required to be noticed at least 10 days before the date of the hearing.

(d) The notice shall include all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the person notified.

(2) The nature of the hearing.

(3) Each section and subdivision under which the proceeding has been initiated.

(4) The date, time, and place of the hearing.

(5) The name of the child upon whose behalf the petition has been brought.

(6) A statement that:

(A) If they fail to appear, the court may proceed without them.

(B) The child, parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or adult relative to whom notice is required to be given pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (9) of subdivision (a) is entitled to have an attorney present at the hearing.

(C) If the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or adult relative noticed pursuant to paragraph
 (1), (2), (3), (4), or (9) of subdivision (a) is indigent and cannot afford an attorney, and desires to be represented by an attorney, the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or adult relative shall promptly notify the clerk of the juvenile court.

(D) If an attorney is appointed to represent the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or adult relative, the represented person shall be liable for all or a portion of the costs to the extent of his or her ability to pay.

(E) The parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or adult relative may be liable for the costs of support of the child in any out-of-home placement.

(7) A copy of the petition.

(e) Service of the notice of the hearing shall be given in the following manner:

(1) If the child is detained and the persons required to be noticed are not present at the initial petition hearing, they shall be noticed by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(2) If the child is detained and the persons required to be noticed are present at the initial petition hearing, they shall be noticed by personal service, by first-class mail, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(3) If the child is not detained, the persons required to be noticed shall be noticed by personal service, by first-class mail, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, unless the person to be served is known to reside outside the county, in which case service shall be by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.
